Georgia, session 2025_26, HB613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to Department of
Administrative Services, is amended in Code Section 50-5-72, relating to construction and
public works contracts conducted by department, advertising costs, and exceptions, by
adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(f) As used in this subsection, the term 'public works construction contract' means any
contract exceeding a total expenditure of $1 million that involves construction,
reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation, installation, alteration, renovation, demolition,
or otherwise providing for any building, facility, or physical structure of any kind for any
department, board, bureau, commission, office, or agency of the state government. When
H. B. 613
- 1 -

LC 52 0768
contracting for any public works construction project, the Department of Administrative
Services shall give preference as far as may be reasonable and practicable to a contractor
or subcontractor that, at the time of the bid for such contract, participates in a registered
apprenticeship program under Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 20 which is appropriate for
the type and scope of work to be performed under such contract."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 613
- 2 -